pt-BR: Tipo de conexão DVI: DVI-A; DVI-D link duplo; DVI-D link único; DVI-I link duplo; DVI-I link único; Mini-DVI; Outro
ja: DVI接続タイプ: DVI-A; DVI-Dデュアルリンク; DVI-Dシングルリンク; DVI-Iデュアルリンク; DVI-Iシングルリンク; Mini-DVI; その他
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης DVI: DVI-A; DVI-D dual link; DVI-D single link; DVI-I dual link; DVI-I single link; Mini-DVI; Άλλο
zh-TW: DVI 連接類型: DVI-A; DVI-D 雙連結; DVI-D 單連結; DVI-I 雙連結; DVI-I 單連結; Mini-DVI; 其他
da: DVI-forbindelsestype: DVI-A; DVI-D dual link; DVI-D single link; DVI-I dual link; DVI-I single link; Mini-DVI; Andet
hr-HR: Tip DVI veze: DVI-A; DVI-D dvostruka veza; DVI-D jednostruka veza; DVI-I dvostruka veza; DVI-I jednostruka veza; Mini-DVI; Ostalo
pl: Typ połączenia DVI: DVI-A; DVI-D dual link; DVI-D single link; DVI-I dual link; DVI-I single link; Mini-DVI; Inne
zh-CN: DVI 连接类型: DVI-A; DVI-D 双通道; DVI-D 单通道; DVI-I 双通道; DVI-I 单通道; Mini-DVI; 其他
tr: DVI bağlantı tipi: DVI-A; DVI-D çift bağlantılı; DVI-D tek bağlantılı; DVI-I çift bağlantılı; DVI-I tek bağlantılı; Mini-DVI; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ pripojenia DVI: DVI-A; DVI-D dvojitý spoj; DVI-D jednoduchý spoj; DVI-I dvojitý spoj; DVI-I jednoduchý spoj; Mini-DVI; Iné
en: DVI connection type: DVI-A; DVI-D dual link; DVI-D single link; DVI-I dual link; DVI-I single link; Mini-DVI; Other
ru: Тип соединения DVI: DVI-A; DVI-D двойной канал; DVI-D одинарный канал; DVI-I двойной канал; DVI-I одинарный канал; Мини-DVI; Другой
sv: DVI-anslutningstyp: DVI-A; DVI-D dual link; DVI-D single link; DVI-I dual link; DVI-I single link; Mini-DVI; Övrigt
lt-LT: DVI jungties tipas: DVI-A; DVI-D dviguba jungtis; DVI-D vienguba jungtis; DVI-I dviguba jungtis; DVI-I vienguba jungtis; Mini-DVI; Kita
de: DVI-Verbindungstyp: DVI-A; DVI-D Dual-Link; DVI-D Single-Link; DVI-I Dual-Link; DVI-I Single-Link; Mini-DVI; Sonstiges
vi: Loại kết nối DVI: Dvi-a; Dvi-d liên kết kép; Dvi-d liên kết đơn; Dvi-i liên kết kép; Dvi-i liên kết đơn; Mini-dvi; Khác
th: ประเภทการเชื่อมต่อ DVI: DVI-A; DVI-D ดูอัลลิงค์; DVI-D ซิงเกิลลิงค์; DVI-I ดูอัลลิงค์; DVI-I ซิงเกิลลิงค์; Mini-DVI; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip de conexiune DVI: DVI-A; DVI-D dual link; DVI-D single link; DVI-I dual link; DVI-I single link; Mini-DVI; Altele
nb: DVI-tilkoblingstype: DVI-A; DVI-D dual link; DVI-D single link; DVI-I dual link; DVI-I single link; Mini-DVI; Annet
sl-SI: Tip povezave DVI: DVI-A; DVI-D dvojna povezava; DVI-D enojna povezava; DVI-I dvojna povezava; DVI-I enojna povezava; Mini-DVI; Drugo
es: Tipo de conexión DVI: DVI-A; DVI-D enlace dual; DVI-D enlace único; DVI-I enlace dual; DVI-I enlace único; Mini-DVI; Otros
cs: Typ připojení DVI: DVI-A; DVI-D dual link; DVI-D single link; DVI-I dual link; DVI-I single link; Mini-DVI; Jiné
it: Tipo di connessione DVI: DVI-A; DVI-D dual link; DVI-D single link; DVI-I dual link; DVI-I single link; Mini-DVI; Altro
bg-BG: Тип DVI връзка: DVI-A; DVI-D двойна връзка; DVI-D единична връзка; DVI-I двойна връзка; DVI-I единична връзка; Mini-DVI; Други
nl: Type DVI-verbinding: DVI-A; DVI-D dual link; DVI-D single link; DVI-I dual link; DVI-I single link; Mini-DVI; Andere
fi: DVI-liitäntätyyppi: DVI-A; DVI-D kaksoisyhteys; DVI-D yksittäisyhteys; DVI-I kaksoisyhteys; DVI-I yksittäisyhteys; Mini-DVI; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de ligação DVI: DVI-A; DVI-D ligação dupla; DVI-D ligação única; DVI-I ligação dupla; DVI-I ligação única; Mini-DVI; Outro
hu: DVI-csatlakozás típusa: DVI-A; DVI-D kétkapcsolatú; DVI-D egykapcsolatú; DVI-I kétkapcsolatú; DVI-I egykapcsolatú; Mini-DVI; Egyéb
ko: DVI 연결 유형: DVI-A; DVI-D 듀얼 링크; DVI-D 싱글 링크; DVI-I 듀얼 링크; DVI-I 싱글 링크; 미니 DVI; 기타
fr: Type de connexion DVI: DVI-A; DVI-D double liaison; DVI-D simple liaison; DVI-I double liaison; DVI-I simple liaison; Mini-DVI; Autre